Utah statutes.
72-10-405.   Airport zoning regulations -- Adoption and amendment -- Airport zoning commission -- Powers and duties.

(1) (a)  An airport zoning regulation may not be adopted, amended, or changed under this part except by action of the legislative body of the political subdivision in question, or the joint board provided for in Subsection 72-10-403(2), after a public hearing at which parties in interest and citizens shall have an opportunity to be heard.

(b)  At least 15 days' notice of the hearing shall be published in an official paper, or a paper of general circulation, in the political subdivision or subdivisions in which is located the airport hazard area to be zoned.

(2) (a)  Prior to the initial zoning of any airport hazard area under this part, the political subdivision or joint airport zoning board which is to adopt the regulations shall appoint a commission, to be known as the airport zoning commission, to recommend the boundaries of the various zones to be established and the regulations to be adopted.

(b)  The commission shall make a preliminary report and hold public hearings before submitting its final report, and the legislative body of the political subdivision or the joint airport zoning board may not hold its public hearings or take other action until it has received the final report of the commission.

(c)  If a comprehensive zoning commission already exists, it may be appointed as the airport zoning commission.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

